electron_app/dictionaries/pt_BR.aff
SFX Z Y 48
SFX Z   erir            iro/PL                  erir
SFX Z   ir              es/PL                   erir
SFX Z   ir              e/PL                    erir
SFX Z   r               mos/PL                  erir
SFX Z   r               s/PL                    erir
SFX Z   ir              em/PL                   erir
SFX Z   erir            ira/PL                  erir
SFX Z   erir            iras/PL                 erir
SFX Z   erir            iramos/PL               erir
SFX Z   erir            irais/PL                erir
SFX Z   erir            iram/PL                 erir
SFX Z   ir              e/PL                    erir
SFX Z   erir            ira/PL                  erir
SFX Z   erir            iramos/PL               erir
SFX Z   ir              i/PL                    erir
SFX Z   erir            iram/PL                 erir
SFX Z   ar              io/PL                   ear
SFX Z   ar              ias/PL                  ear
SFX Z   ar              ia/PL                   ear
SFX Z   r               mos/PL                  ear
SFX Z   r               is/PL                   ear
SFX Z   ar              iam/PL                  ear
SFX Z   ar              ie/PL                   ear
SFX Z   ar              ies/PL                  ear
SFX Z   ar              emos/PL                 ear
SFX Z   ar              eis/PL                  ear
SFX Z   ar              iem/PL                  ear
SFX Z   ar              ia/PL                   ear
SFX Z   ar              ie/PL                   ear
SFX Z   ar              emos/PL                 ear
SFX Z   ar              ai/PL                   ear
SFX Z   ar              iem/PL                  ear
SFX Z   ir              o/PL                    uzir
SFX Z   ir              es/PL                   uzir
SFX Z   zir             z/PL                    uzir
SFX Z   r               mos/PL                  uzir
SFX Z   r               s/PL                    uzir
SFX Z   ir              em/PL                   uzir
SFX Z   ir              a/PL                    uzir
SFX Z   ir              as/PL                   uzir
SFX Z   ir              amos/PL                 uzir
SFX Z   ir              ais/PL                  uzir
SFX Z   ir              am/PL                   uzir
SFX Z   zir             z/PL                    uzir
SFX Z   ir              a/PL                    uzir
SFX Z   ir              amos/PL                 uzir
SFX Z   ir              i/PL                    uzir
SFX Z   ir              am/PL                   uzir
